Illinois, session 104th, SB3032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Sections 214, 223, and 240 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/214)7    Sec. 214. Tax credit for affordable housing donations. 8    (a) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 9December 31, 2001 and until the taxable year ending on 10December 31, 2026, a taxpayer who makes a donation under 11Section 7.28 of the Illinois Housing Development Act is 12entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 13(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 50% of the 14value of the donation. For taxable years ending before 15December 31, 2023, partners, shareholders of subchapter S 16corporations, and owners of limited liability companies (if 17the limited liability company is treated as a partnership for 18purposes of federal and State income taxation) are entitled to 19a credit under this Section to be determined in accordance 20with the determination of income and distributive share of 21income under Sections 702 and 703 and subchapter S of the 22Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or after 23December 31, 2023, partners and shareholders of subchapter S   SB3032- 2 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1corporations are entitled to a credit under this Section as 2provided in Section 251. Persons or entities not subject to 3the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 and 4who make a donation under Section 7.28 of the Illinois Housing 5Development Act are entitled to a credit as described in this 6subsection and may transfer that credit as described in 7subsection (c).8    (b) If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 9for the year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to 10the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 11credit year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest 12year for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits 13for more than one year that are available to offset a 14liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first.15    (c) The transfer of the tax credit allowed under this 16Section may be made (i) to the purchaser of land that has been 17designated solely for affordable housing projects in 18accordance with the Illinois Housing Development Act or (ii) 19to another donor who has also made a donation in accordance 20with Section 7.28 of the Illinois Housing Development Act. 21Projects funded in whole or in part by the proceeds of tax 22credits transferred pursuant to this subsection shall be 23considered public works within the meaning of the Prevailing 24Wage Act. 25    (d) A taxpayer claiming the credit provided by this 26Section must maintain and record any information that the   SB3032- 3 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1Department may require by regulation regarding the project for 2which the credit is claimed. When claiming the credit provided 3by this Section, the taxpayer must provide information 4regarding the taxpayer's donation to the project under the 5Illinois Housing Development Act.6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-175, eff. 7-29-21; 7103-396, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    (35 ILCS 5/223)9    Sec. 223. Hospital credit. 10    (a) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 2012 and 11ending on or before December 31, 2027, a taxpayer that is the 12owner of a hospital licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act, 13but not including an organization that is exempt from federal 14income taxes under the Internal Revenue Code, is entitled to a 15credit against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 16of Section 201 of this Act in an amount equal to the lesser of 17the amount of real property taxes paid during the tax year on 18real property used for hospital purposes during the prior tax 19year or the cost of free or discounted services provided 20during the tax year pursuant to the hospital's charitable 21financial assistance policy, measured at cost.22    (b) If the taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 23corporation, the credit is allowed to the partners or 24shareholders in accordance with the determination of income 25and distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704   SB3032- 4 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. A transfer of 2this credit may be made by the taxpayer earning the credit 3within one year after the credit is earned in accordance with 4rules adopted by the Department. Projects funded in whole or 5in part by the proceeds of tax credits transferred pursuant to 6this subsection shall be considered public works within the 7meaning of the Prevailing Wage Act. The Department shall 8prescribe rules to enforce and administer provisions of this 9Section. If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 10for the year, then the excess credit may be carried forward and 11applied to the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following 12the excess credit year. The credit shall be applied to the 13earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 14credits from more than one tax year that are available to 15offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first. 16In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce the 17taxpayer's liability to less than zero.18(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 102-886, eff. 5-17-22.) 19    (35 ILCS 5/240)20    Sec. 240. Hydrogen fuel replacement tax credits.21    (a) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 2027 and 22beginning before January 1, 2029, an eligible taxpayer who 23qualifies for a credit under the Hydrogen Fuel Replacement Tax 24Credit Act is entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed 25under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act as   SB3032- 5 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1provided in that Act. If the eligible taxpayer is a 2partnership or Subchapter S corporation, the credit shall be 3allowed to the partners or shareholders in accordance with the 4determination of income and distributive share of income under 5Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue 6Code. 7    (b) If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 8for the year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to 9the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 10credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest year 11for which there is a tax liability. If there are credits from 12more than one tax year that are available to offset a 13liability, the earlier credit shall be applied first. In no 14event shall a credit under this Section reduce the taxpayer's 15liability to less than zero. 16    (c) A sale, assignment, or transfer of the tax credit may 17be made by the taxpayer earning the credit within one year 18after the credit is awarded in accordance with rules adopted 19by the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 20Projects funded in whole or in part by the proceeds of tax 21credits transferred pursuant to this subsection shall be 22considered public works within the meaning of the Prevailing 23Wage Act. 24    (d) A person claiming the credit allowed under this 25Section shall attach to its Illinois income tax return a copy 26of the tax credit certificate or the transfer certificate   SB3032- 6 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1issued by the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 2(Source: P.A. 103-268, eff. 7-25-23.) 3    Section 20. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 4Section 2 as follows: 5    (820 ILCS 130/2)6    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 7mechanics, and other workers employed in any public works, as 8hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 9contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 10repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 11whether owned, leased, or rented.12    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 13otherwise:14    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 15demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 16out of public funds. "Public works" as defined herein includes 17all projects financed in whole or in part with bonds, grants, 18loans, or other funds made available by or through the State or 19any of its political subdivisions, including, but not limited 20to: bonds issued under the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act 21(Article 11, Division 74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the 22Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance 23Authority Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 24or the Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made   SB3032- 7 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other 2funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront Development 3Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 4Act; funds received from the sale or transfer of tax credits 5awarded by the State, other than tax credits awarded under the 6Film Production Services Tax Credit Act of 2008 or the Live 7Theater Production Tax Credit Act; or funds from the Fund for 8Illinois' Future under Section 6z-47 of the State Finance Act, 9funds for school construction under Section 5 of the General 10Obligation Bond Act, funds authorized under Section 3 of the 11School Construction Bond Act, funds for school infrastructure 12under Section 6z-45 of the State Finance Act, and funds for 13transportation purposes under Section 4 of the General 14Obligation Bond Act. "Public works" also includes all federal 15construction projects administered or controlled by a public 16body if the prevailing rate of wages is equal to or greater 17than the prevailing wage determination by the United States 18Secretary of Labor for the same locality for the same type of 19construction used to classify the federal construction 20project. "Public works" also includes (i) all projects 21financed in whole or in part with funds from the Environmental 22Protection Agency under the Illinois Renewable Fuels 23Development Program Act for which there is no project labor 24agreement; (ii) all work performed pursuant to a public 25private agreement under the Public Private Agreements for the 26Illiana Expressway Act or the Public-Private Agreements for   SB3032- 8 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1the South Suburban Airport Act; (iii) all projects undertaken 2under a public-private agreement under the Public-Private 3Partnerships for Transportation Act or the Department of 4Natural Resources World Shooting and Recreational Complex Act; 5and (iv) all transportation facilities undertaken under a 6design-build contract or a Construction Manager/General 7Contractor contract under the Innovations for Transportation 8Infrastructure Act. "Public works" also includes all projects 9at leased facility property used for airport purposes under 10Section 35 of the Local Government Facility Lease Act. "Public 11works" also includes the construction of a new wind power 12facility by a business designated as a High Impact Business 13under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 14Act, the construction of a new utility-scale solar power 15facility by a business designated as a High Impact Business 16under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 17Act, the construction of a new battery energy storage solution 18facility by a business designated as a High Impact Business 19under Section 5.5(a)(3)(I) of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 20Act, and the construction of a high voltage direct current 21converter station by a business designated as a High Impact 22Business under Section 5.5(a)(3)(J) of the Illinois Enterprise 23Zone Act. "Public works" also includes electric vehicle 24charging station projects financed pursuant to the Electric 25Vehicle Act and renewable energy projects required to pay the 26prevailing wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency Act.   SB3032- 9 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1"Public works" also includes power washing projects by a 2public body or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds 3in which steam or pressurized water, with or without added 4abrasives or chemicals, is used to remove paint or other 5coatings, oils or grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface 6or to prepare a surface for a coating. "Public works" also 7includes all electric transmission systems projects subject to 8the Electric Transmission Systems Construction Standards Act. 9"Public works" does not include work done directly by any 10public utility company, whether or not done under public 11supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 12public funds. "Public works" also includes construction 13projects performed by a third party contracted by any public 14utility, as described in subsection (a) of Section 2.1, in 15public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the 16Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 17supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 18public funds. "Public works" also includes construction 19projects that exceed 15 aggregate miles of new fiber optic 20cable, performed by a third party contracted by any public 21utility, as described in subsection (b) of Section 2.1, in 22public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of the 23Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 24supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 25public funds. "Public works" also includes any corrective 26action performed pursuant to Title XVI of the Environmental   SB3032- 10 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1Protection Act for which payment from the Underground Storage 2Tank Fund is requested. "Public works" also includes all 3construction projects involving fixtures or permanent 4attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by a public 5body, including street light poles, traffic light poles, and 6other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under public 7supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 8public funds, unless the project is performed by employees 9employed directly by the public body. "Public works" also 10includes work performed subject to the Mechanical Insulation 11Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" also includes 12the removal, hauling, and transportation of biosolids, lime 13sludge, and lime residue from a water treatment plant or 14facility and the disposal of biosolids, lime sludge, and lime 15residue removed from a water treatment plant or facility at a 16landfill. "Public works" also includes sewer inspection 17projects that use a closed-circuit television to identify 18issues in a sewer system, such as cracks in pipes, root 19intrusion, blockages, or other structural damage. "Public 20works" does not include projects undertaken by the owner at an 21owner-occupied single-family residence or at an owner-occupied 22unit of a multi-family residence. "Public works" does not 23include work performed for soil and water conservation 24purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not done under 25public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out of public 26funds, done directly by an owner or person who has legal   SB3032- 11 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1control of those lands. 2    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 3laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 4repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 5whether owned, leased, or rented.6    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 7public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 8available in the county a sufficient number of competent 9skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 10public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 11other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 12is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 13in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 14respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 15Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion 16of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 17construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 18workers may be accessible for work on such construction.19    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 20commission of the State or any political subdivision or 21department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 22in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 23town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 24reclamation improvement or other district and every other 25political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 26whether such political subdivision, municipality or district   SB3032- 12 -LRB104 16574 TRT 29973 b1operates under a special charter or not.2    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 3exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 4or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 5    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 6"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 7wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 8full journeyman annualized fringe benefits for training and 9apprenticeship programs registered with the Office of 10Apprenticeship within the U.S. Department of Labor's 11Employment and Training Administration with full journeymen 12annualized fringe benefits for health and welfare, insurance, 13vacations, and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 14which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 15work of a similar character on public works.16(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-346, eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 188-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 2-20-25; 104-17, 19eff. 6-30-25; 104-23, eff. 6-30-25; 104-160, eff. 8-14-25; 20revised 9-12-25.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.